Louisiana, session 2026, SB306.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:38.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§38.6. Obstruction of the freedom of worship in a church or other place of
worship
A. Obstruction of the freedom of worship at a church or other place of
worship is committed when a person does any of the following:
(1) Uses force, the threat of force, physical obstruction, intentional
injury, or attempted intentional injury, to intimidate or interfere with any
person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise the right of the free exercise of
religion at a church or other place of worship that is protected by the First
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America and by Article
XII, Section 17 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2) Intentionally damages or destroys the property of a church or other
place of worship.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 306 ENROLLED
(3) Willfully denies an attendee, clergy, or member of the staff of a
church or other place of worship any of the following:
(a) Lawful freedom of movement on the property of the church or other
place of worship.
(b) Lawful use of any property or facilities of a church or other place of
worship.
(c) Lawful ingress and egress to and from the physical facilities of a
church or other place of worship.
(4) Willfully refuses or fails to leave the private property of the church
or other place of worship when requested to do so by the clergy, when the
person is committing, threatening to commit, or inciting others to commit any
disruptive activity that is intended to disrupt, impair, interfere with or obstruct
the worship service in a church or other place of worship.
(5) Engages in a disruptive activity at a church or other place of worship.
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Attendee" means a person who is lawfully present in a church or
other place of worship, or is engaging in the lawful ingress and egress thereto.
(2) "Church or other place of worship" means any building, structure,
or defined outdoor area that is owned, leased, or otherwise lawfully possessed
by a religious organization that is used for organized religious worship or other
religious activities.
(3) "Clergy" means the pastor of the church, a deacon, or other member
of the religious organization who has authority over the administration of the
church or other place of worship or has been designated by the religious
organization with such authority.
(4)(a) "Disruptive activity" means intentional conduct occurring on the
property of a church or other place of worship during a worship service that
materially and substantially interferes with the service, including interruption
of the service or obstruction of access to any area used in connection with the
service, such as a sanctuary, chapel, nursery, children's ministry area, or other
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 306 ENROLLED
designated worship-related space.
(b) "Disruptive activity" does not include behavior otherwise prohibited
by Subsection A of this Section.
(5) "Religious organization" means an entity that is operated for
religious purposes and qualifies for exemption from taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C.
Section 501).
(6) "Worship service" means a regularly scheduled religious meeting or
assembly held at a church or other place of worship for the purpose of worship
or religious observance.
C.(1) Whoever commits obstruction of the freedom of worship in a
church or other place of worship shall be fined not more than two thousand five
hundred dollars, or imprisoned for not less than fifteen days nor more than six
months, or both.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, the offender shall be fined not
more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or imprisoned with or without hard
labor for not less than one year nor more than eighteen months, or both.
(3) In addition to any other penalty imposed pursuant to this Subsection,
when the offense results in bodily injury of a lawful attendee, member of the
clergy, or staff member, the offender shall be sentenced to not less than two
years and not more than ten years at hard labor.
D. Any person who knowingly finances, funds, or otherwise provides
material support or assistance to another person with the intent to facilitate,
promote, or cause a violation of this Section shall be deemed to be a principal
pursuant to R.S. 14:24 and shall be subject to the same penalties as the person
who directly commits the violation of this Section.
Section 2. Civil Code Art. 2315.14 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315.14. Liability for damages caused by offenses related to obstruction of
freedom of worship in a church or other place of worship
A. In addition to general and special damages, a prevailing plaintiff shall
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 306 ENROLLED
be awarded court costs and reasonable attorney fees upon proof that the
injuries on which the action is based were caused by conduct prohibited by R.S.
14:38.6 resulting in the injury to the person, obstruction of the freedom of
worship in a church or other place of worship, or damage to property,
regardless of whether the defendant was arrested, charged, or prosecuted for
such conduct.
B. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to limit any other cause of
action or remedy provided by law.
C. As used in this Article, a defendant includes any person who
knowingly aided, abetted, financed, funded, solicited, conspired, or otherwise
provided material support or assistance for conduct prohibited by R.S. 14:38.6.
D.(1) Recoverable damages pursuant to this Article may include but are
not limited to damages for physical injury, mental anguish, emotional distress,
property damage, lost income, interference with the free exercise of religion,
and any other damages authorized by law.
(2) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a court may grant
temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, permanent injunctions,
or declaratory relief, as well as court costs and reasonable attorney fees, to
prevent the conduct, or to prevent the continuation of the conduct, that is
prohibited by R.S. 14:38.6.
Section 3. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The free exercise of religion and the right of individuals to assemble for worship
services is protected by the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States of
America and Article I, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2) In 2023, the legislature and the people of Louisiana adopted Article XII, Section
17 of the Constitution of Louisiana which provides that "(t)he freedom to worship in a
church or other place of worship is a fundamental right that is worthy of the highest order
of protection".
(3) The intentional interference with a scheduled worship service undermines these
fundamental rights to the free exercise of religion and the freedom to worship in a church
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 306 ENROLLED
or other place of worship by disrupting the orderly practice of religion and can create a
danger to persons attending the worship service.
(4) The right to engage in a peaceful protest is essential to a free society of people,
and that right extends to public places that are traditionally open to political speech and
debate, including public streets, sidewalks, and parks with minimal constitutional
restrictions; however, that right has never been interpreted to authorize the trespass or
disruptive activity on private property, such as a church or other place of worship or at a
home.
(5) Prevention of the willful disruption of worship services and religious activities
is a matter of statewide concern.
(6) It is a compelling interest of this state to protect the ability of its people to meet
and assemble for the exercise of religious worship and other religious activities guaranteed
by the Free Exercise Clause of the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States
of America as well as Article I, Section 8 and Article XII, Section 17 of the Constitution of
Louisiana.
(7) It is imperative to a free society and the survival of a constitutional republic that
the state of Louisiana protects attendees in churches or other places of worship so that the
attendees are free from intentional acts that materially interfere or disrupt a scheduled
worship service or other religious activity that is conducted on the private property that is
set aside by the religious organization for constitutionally protected religious assemblies.
Section 4. The legislature declares that the purpose of this Act is to enact protections
that may be enforced at the state level, by state law enforcement authorities, in a similar
manner that federal law enforcement authorities, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 248(a)(2), are able
to protect the free exercise of religion at a place of religious worship by prohibiting the use
of force, threats of force, or physical obstruction to injure, intimidate, or interfere with any
person exercising their right to worship at a church or other place of worship.
Section 5. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 306 ENROLLED
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.